Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202633-107.04
Case management systems software fee.

In addition to all other court costs assessed according to law, a case management systems software fee of ten dollars shall be taxed as costs in each civil cause of action or traffic misdemeanor or infraction filed in the district courts and county courts. The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the end of the month. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the Case Management Systems Software Cash Fund.

Laws 2026, LB935, § 36.
July 1, 2026